src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@kavatsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kavatsus OLULINE  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kavatsuslikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kˈavatsusl˘ikkus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kaver+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kaver REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kavern+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kav˘ern TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kašelott+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kˈašel˘otʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kašgaar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kašg˘aar TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kašmiir+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kašm˘iir TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
kašnee+N:kašn˘ee%>%{id%}%{rare%} ARMEE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kašpoo+N:kašp˘oo ARMEE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kašuub+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kaš˘uub TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kebab+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kebab REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
kebratšo+N:kebrˈatšo PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keder+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eT2E2r%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
kederluu+N:keder%#l˘uu%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 11 " ; 
kedri+N:kedri RUBLA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kedrid+N:kedri RUBLA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kedrik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kedrik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
kedristõlvik+N:kedris%#tõlʲvik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kedrus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kedrus SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Case.Nom@@D.Stem.Guessed@kee+N:@D.Case.Nom@@D.Stem.Guessed@k˘ee ARMEE  "weight: 9 " ; 
keede+N:k˘eeT2e PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keedis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keedis SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeduaparaat+N:keedu%#ˈapar˘aat TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
keedukoda+N:keedu%#koJ1D1a%{stemill%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
keedukunst+N:keedu%#k˘unʲst TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keedus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keedus SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keedutaigen+N:keedu%#t˘aigE2n MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeduvili+N:keedu%#v˘ilʲJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keefir+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eefir REDEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keegel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eegel%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeglimäng+N:k˘eegli%#m˘äng%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keeks+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eeks TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eel%{stemill%} KEEL  "weight: 4 " ; 
keelaja+N:k˘eelaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelamine+N:k˘eelamine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
keelatu+N:keelatu AASTA  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keeld+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eelD1%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 8 " ; 
keeldumine+N:k˘eeldumine OLULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keeldumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eeldumus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelebarjäär+N:keele%#barj˘äär TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
keeleinspektsioon+N:keele%#inspektsi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelekandja+N:keele%#k˘anʲdja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelekandmine+N:keele%#k˘andmine SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelekanne+N:keele%#k˘anD1e PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelekas+N:keeleka LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelekaste+N:keele%#k˘aste PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelekastmine+N:keele%#k˘astmine SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keelekasutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keele%#kasutus OLULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
keelekeskkond+N:keele%#k˘eskk˘onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keelekursus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keele%#k˘ursus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeleköidik+N:keele%#köidik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keelekümblus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keele%#k˘ümblus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keeleküsimus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keele%#küsimus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelelõksutamine+N:keele%#lõksutamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelemees+N:keele%#me MEES  "weight: 10 " ; 
keelemurre+N:keele%#m˘urD1e PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keelend+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keelend REDEL  "weight: 9 " ; 
keelenõue+N:keele%#n˘õuD1e PINGE  "weight: 10 " ; 
keeleoskaja+N:keele%#˘oskaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keeleoskus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keele%#˘oskus SUULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
keeleots+N:keele%#˘ots%>%{pl.i%} KAEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
keelepael+N:keele%#p˘ael%>%{pl.u%} KAEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
keelepeks+N:keele%#p˘eks%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelepeksja+N:keele%#p˘eksja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelepeksmine+N:keele%#p˘eksmine SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeleprobleem+N:keele%#probl˘eem TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelepruuk+N:keele%#pr˘uuk TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keeleseadus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keele%#s˘eadus SUULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
keelesepp+N:keele%#s˘epp%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelestu+N:keelestu AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeletark+N:keele%#t˘ark%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeleteadlane+N:keele%#t˘eadlane SUULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keeleteadus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keele%#t˘eadus SUULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
keeletemp+N:keele%#t˘emp%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeletoimetaja+N:keele%#toimetaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeletundja+N:keele%#t˘unʲdja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeletunne+N:keele%#t˘unD1e PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keeletus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keeletus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeleuurija+N:keele%#˘uurija AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keelevahetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keele%#vahetus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelevaist+N:keele%#v˘aist%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelevigur+N:keele%#vigur REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeleõpe+N:keele%#˘õpP1e PINGE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keelik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keelik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelikas+N:keelika LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelitamine+N:keelitamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keelitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keelitus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelkond+N:k˘eelk˘onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelpill+N:k˘eel%#p˘ilʲl TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
keelpillikvartett+N:k˘eel%#pilʲli%#kvart˘etʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keelsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eelsus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelsuslane+N:k˘eelsuslane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelteoskaja+N:keelte%#˘oskaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeluala+N:keelu%#ala%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelualune+N:keelu%#alune SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelumärk+N:keelu%#m˘ärk TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelustaja+N:keelustaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelustamine+N:keelustamine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keelustus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keelustus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keem+N:k˘eem%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 10 " ; 
keemia+N:k˘eemia AASTA  "weight: 8 " ; 
keemiakombinaat+N:k˘eemia%#kˈombin˘aat TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keemiasaadus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eemia%#s˘aadus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keemiatehas+N:k˘eemia%#tehas SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keemiatööstus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eemia%#t˘ööstus SUULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keemik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keemik VIRSIK  "weight: 9 " ; 
keenialane+N:k˘eenialane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keenialanna+N:k˘eenialanna PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keenlane+N:k˘eenlane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keep+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eep TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
keeramine+N:k˘eeramine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keerang+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keerang VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
keerasmik+N:kˈeerasm˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keerd+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eerD1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 10 " ; 
keerdkäigustik+N:k˘eerd%#käigust˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
keerdkäik+N:k˘eerd%#k˘äik%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keerdküsimus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eerd%#küsimus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
keerdsõlm+N:k˘eerd%#s˘õlʲm%>%{pl.i%} EIT  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keerdumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eerdumus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keere+N:k˘eerD1e PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keere+N:k˘eerE2 HAARE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keerenski+N:keerenski AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keerik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keerik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keeris+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keeris SOOLANE  "weight: 9 " ; 
keeristorm+N:keeris%#t˘orm TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
keerisviljak+N:keeris%#vilʲjak VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeritis+N:keeritis OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keerits+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keerits MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
keeritsuss+N:keerits%#˘usʲs TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keerlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eerlus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
keermestik+N:k˘eermest˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keermestus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keermestus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keermik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eerm˘ik ÄMBLIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keerub+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keerub REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
